Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 1. Teacher Certification.

Administrative Code. —

For certification of professional teachers, see 4 AAC 12.

Collateral references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools, §§ 136-141.

78 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts, § 191 et seq.

Tests of moral character of fitness as requisite to issuance of teacher’s license or certificate. 96 ALR2d 536.

Bias of members of license revocation board. 97 ALR2d 1210.

Actionability of statements imputing inefficiency or lack of qualification to public school teacher. 40 ALR3d 490.

Self-defense or defense of another as justification, in dismissal proceedings, for use or threat of use of force against student. 37 ALR4th 842.

Liability of school authorities for hiring or retaining incompetent or otherwise unsuitable teacher. 60 ALR4th 260.

Sec. 14.20.010.
Teacher certificate required.

A person may not be employed as a teacher in the public schools of the state unless that person possesses a valid teacher certificate except that a person who has made application to the department for a teacher certificate, including a preliminary teacher certificate under AS

14.20.015

, or renewal of a teacher certificate that has not been acted upon by the department may be employed as a teacher in the public schools of the state until the department has taken action on the application, but in no case may employment without a certificate last longer than three months. A person who has made application for a certificate under this section may teach for an additional 60 days beyond three months without a certificate if the department grants a written extension. An extension may be granted under this section for not more than 60 days to the person solely due to delay in the department’s receipt of criminal justice information under AS 12.62 or a national criminal history record check under AS

12.62.400

.

History.

(§ 37-5-3 ACLA 1949; am § 9 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 165 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 2001; am § 8 ch 79 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For statewide goals, see 4 AAC 4.

For certification of professional teachers, see 4 AAC 12.

For correspondence study programs, see 4 AAC 33, art. 4.

Sec. 14.20.015.
Recognition of certificates of out-of-state teachers.

The department shall issue a preliminary teacher certificate to an out-of-state teacher who meets the requirements of this section. To be eligible for a preliminary teacher certificate, a person shall

have received at least a baccalaureate degree from an institution of higher education accredited by a recognized regional accrediting association or approved by the commissioner;

hold a valid teacher certificate issued by another state;

have submitted fingerprints to the department to be used for a criminal history background check and been found by the department to be suitable for employment as a teacher under AS

14.20.020(f)

;

have paid the fee required by the department under AS

14.20.020(c)

.

An out-of-state teacher who has been issued a preliminary teacher certificate under this section shall pass the competency examination designated by the board under AS

14.20.020(i)

within one year after the date the preliminary teacher certificate was issued. If the teacher does not pass the examination, the department shall immediately revoke the teacher’s preliminary teacher certificate.

The preliminary teacher certificate issued under this section must contain the same endorsements as those on the current valid teacher certificate issued by the other state.

A teacher holding a preliminary teacher certificate issued under this section may be employed to provide instructional services for a school district or regional educational attendance area only if the teacher certificate issued by the other state is valid at the time the teacher commences to provide instructional services for the school district or regional educational attendance area.

Employment under a preliminary teacher certificate shall be considered in determining whether a teacher qualifies for tenure under AS

14.20.150

. However, a teacher may not be granted tenure unless the teacher holds a teacher certificate issued under AS

14.20.020

.

A preliminary teacher certificate and any endorsements issued under this section are valid for three years and may not be renewed. The department may not issue a provisional certificate or a temporary certificate to a teacher who has held a preliminary teacher certificate.

History.

(§ 2 ch 58 SLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For certification of professional teachers, see 4 AAC 12.

Sec. 14.20.017.
Grace period for issuance of regular teacher certificates to previously certificated teachers.

The department shall issue a teacher certificate as described in AS

14.20.020

, subject to revocation, to a teacher who meets the requirements of this section. To be eligible for a revocable teacher certificate under this section, a person shall

have held a valid teacher certificate issued under AS

14.20.020

that expired more than 12 months before the teacher applied for a certificate under this section;

have paid the fee required by the department under AS

14.20.020(c)

.

A revocable teacher certificate issued under this section is valid for one year, during which the teacher shall complete any requirements for the issuance of a regular teacher certificate under AS

14.20.020

that the teacher has not already met. The department shall expedite the procedures required of teachers holding revocable teacher certificates who are seeking certification under AS

14.20.020

.

A teacher holding a revocable teacher certificate under this section who previously passed the competency examination designated by the board under AS

14.20.020

(i) is not required to retake the examination before being eligible for a regular certificate under AS

14.20.020

. A teacher holding a revocable teacher certificate who did not previously take or pass the competency examination shall take and pass the examination within one year after the date the revocable teacher certificate was issued. If the teacher does not pass the examination, the department shall immediately revoke the revocable teacher certificate.

A teacher holding a revocable teacher certificate under this section may not receive a teacher certificate issued under AS

14.20.020

until the teacher submits fingerprints to the department to be used for a criminal history background check and the teacher has been found by the department to be suitable for employment as a teacher under AS

14.20.020

(f).

The revocable teacher certificate issued under this section must contain the same endorsements as those on the teacher’s expired teacher certificate.

Employment on the basis of a revocable teacher certificate issued under this section shall be considered in determining whether a teacher qualifies for tenure under AS

14.20.150

.

A revocable teacher certificate and any endorsements issued under this section are valid for one year and may not be renewed under this section. The department may not issue a provisional certificate or a temporary certificate to a teacher who has held a teacher certificate issued under this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 58 SLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For certification of professional teachers, see 4 AAC 12.

Sec. 14.20.020.
Requirements for issuance of certificate; fingerprints.

Except as provided in (f) of this section, the department shall issue a teacher certificate to every person who meets the requirements in (b), (c), and (h) of this section.

A person is not eligible for a teacher certificate unless that person has received at least a baccalaureate degree from an institution of higher education accredited by a recognized regional accrediting association or approved by the commissioner and, if applicable, has passed the examination or examinations required by (i) of this section. However, this subsection is not applicable to

persons employed in the state public school system on September 1, 1962;

persons issued an emergency certificate during a situation that, in the judgment of the commissioner, requires the temporary issuance of a certificate to a person not otherwise qualified.

The board may establish by regulation additional requirements for the issuance of certificates. The board shall require teachers to submit fingerprints and the fees required by the Department of Public Safety under AS

12.62.160

for criminal justice information and a national criminal history record check. The board shall submit the fingerprints and fees to the Department of Public Safety for a report of criminal justice information under AS 12.62 and a national criminal history record check under AS

12.62.400

. The department shall establish by regulation the fees to be charged for each certificate and for other charges assessed against teachers as part of certification. In establishing the fees to be charged, the department shall establish the fee levels so that the total amount of the fees collected relating to the certification of teachers approximately equals, when added to the other fees collected from teachers, the actual regulatory costs for certifying and disciplining teachers in the state. The department shall annually review each fee level to determine whether the regulatory costs are approximately equal to fee collections. If the review indicates that fee collections and regulatory costs are not approximately equal, the department shall calculate fee adjustments to the fees for certification of teachers and adopt regulations under this subsection to implement the adjustments. In January of each year, the department shall report on all fee levels and revisions for the previous year under this subsection to the office of management and budget. The department shall consider the board’s recommendations concerning the fee levels and regulatory costs before revising fee schedules to comply with this subsection. In this subsection, “regulatory costs” means costs of the department that are attributable to regulation of the teaching profession, including the portion of the expenses of the board that are attributable to the regulation of the teaching profession and the expenses of the Professional Teaching Practices Commission.

The board may by regulation establish various classes of certificates.

The annual estimated balance in the account maintained by the commissioner of administration under AS

37.05.142

may be used by the legislature to make appropriations to the department to carry out the purposes of this section and to support the activities of the Professional Teaching Practices Commission under AS

14.20.460

,

14.20.470

, and

14.20.500

.

The department may not issue a teacher certificate to a person who has been convicted of a crime, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit a crime, involving a minor under AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.460

or a law or ordinance in another jurisdiction with elements similar to an offense described in this subsection.

The department shall issue a teacher certificate to a person who possessed a valid Alaska teacher certificate upon retirement. A teacher certificate issued under this subsection is valid for the life of the retired teacher and qualifies the holder as a substitute teacher in the state.

A person is not eligible for a teacher certificate unless the person has completed three semester hours in Alaska studies and three semester hours in multicultural education or cross-cultural communications. However, the commissioner may issue a provisional certificate, valid for no longer than two years, to an applicant who has not completed the semester hours required under this subsection at the time of application.

Beginning on July 1, 1998, a person is not eligible for an initial regular teacher certificate unless the person has taken and successfully completed a competency examination or examinations designated, at the time the person took the test, by the board. The board shall review nationally recognized examinations that are designed to test the competency of new teachers and shall designate those examinations that it finds adequately test the skills and abilities of new teachers. For each examination designated under this subsection, the board shall establish the minimum acceptable level of performance.

Whenever required by a provision of this chapter to submit fingerprints to use for a criminal background check for the purpose of determining a person’s suitability for employment as a teacher, the department shall accept a name-based criminal history background check on a person from the agency performing the background check if the

person cannot submit legible fingerprint cards due to a permanent disability that precludes the person’s ability to submit fingerprints; or

agency informs the department that its examination of at least two separate sets of fingerprint cards shows that the person’s fingerprints are illegible due to a permanent skin condition.

A person is not eligible for a teacher certificate unless the person has completed training regarding alcohol and drug related disabilities required under AS

14.20.680

, training regarding sexual abuse and sexual assault awareness and prevention required under AS

14.30.355

, training regarding dating violence and abuse awareness and prevention required under AS

14.30.356

, and training related to suicide prevention required under AS

14.30.362

.

History.

(§ 37-5-4 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 76 SLA 1962; am § 10 ch 98 SLA 1966; am §§ 13, 14 ch 32 SLA 1971; am §§ 19, 20 ch 138 SLA 1986; am §§ 6, 7 ch 151 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 3 SLA 1991; am § 5 ch 90 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 105 SLA 1992; am § 14 ch 32 SLA 1997; am §§ 1 — 3, 6 ch 57 SLA 1997; am § 17 ch 81 SLA 1998; am §§ 9, 10 ch 79 SLA 2004; am § 10 ch 2 SSSLA 2015)

Revisor's notes. —

In 1992, in (f) of this section, “AS

11.41.434

—

11.41.440

” was substituted for “AS

11.41.434

— 11.41.442” in two places to correct a manifest error in § 7, ch. 151, SLA 1990.

Cross references. --

For provision to the applicability of subsection (k), see sec. 27, ch. 2, SSSLA 2015 in the 2015 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For statewide goals, see 4 AAC 4.

For certification of professional teachers, see 4 AAC 12.

For exchange teachers and student teachers, see 4 AAC 30.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective June 30, 2017, added (k).

Editor's notes. —

Section 10, ch. 151, SLA 1990 provides that subsection (f) does not apply when the crime occurred before September 19, 1990.

Section 4, ch. 57, SLA 1997 provides that the requirements for examination established in subsections (b) and (i) by §§ 1 and 3, ch. 57, SLA 1997 “do not apply to a teacher who holds a valid regular teacher certificate on August 28, 1997.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

The State Board of Education may not provide for issuance of a “teacher certificate” for a person who does not hold at least a baccalaureate degree unless the person comes within one of the exceptions enumerated in this section. August 29, 1988 Op. Att’y Gen.

The State Board of Education may provide for a “provisional certificate” that is not a “teacher certificate,” but it may not authorize the holder to be employed as a teacher or to be eligible for membership in the Teachers’ Retirement System unless the certificate is based upon at least a baccalaureate degree. Similarly, a holder of a provisional certificate based on less than a baccalaureate degree would not be considered a “certificated employee” within the meaning of former AS

14.20.550

, relating to collective bargaining rights. August 29, 1988 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 14.20.022.
Subject-matter expert limited teacher certificate.

Notwithstanding AS

14.20.020

, a person may be issued a subject-matter expert limited teacher certificate, valid only in the subject-matter in which the person has expertise, upon compliance with the requirements of this section. A subject-matter expert teacher may only be employed to teach subjects in which the person has satisfied the education or experience requirements set out in (b)(1) of this section.

To be eligible for a subject-matter expert limited teacher certificate, a person shall

hold at least a baccalaureate degree from an institution of higher education accredited by a recognized regional or national accrediting association or approved by the commissioner and

have majored or minored in the subject that the person will be teaching; or

have at least five years experience in the subject matter that the person will be teaching;

have submitted fingerprints and the fees required by the Department of Public Safety under AS

12.62.160

for criminal justice information and a national criminal history record check to the department; the department must have submitted the fingerprints and fees to the Department of Public Safety for a report of criminal justice information under AS 12.62 and a national criminal history record check under AS

12.62.400

and the person must have been found by the department to be suitable for employment as a teacher under AS

14.20.020(f)

; and

be currently enrolled in an approved post-baccalaureate teacher education program at a regionally accredited institution meeting the requirements of AS

14.20.020(b)

that provides for completion of the regular teacher certificate education requirements within two years after receipt of a subject-matter expert limited teacher certificate under this section.

Before a school district or regional educational attendance area determines whether to hire a person as a subject-matter expert teacher under this section, the school district or regional educational attendance area shall administer a competency examination.

A subject-matter expert limited teacher certificate is valid for one school year and may be renewed for one additional school year upon a showing of substantial progress towards completion of the teacher education program required under (b)(3) of this section.

A school district or regional educational attendance area that employs a subject-matter expert teacher shall provide a mentor who is an experienced teacher for the subject-matter expert teacher for at least the first year of the subject-matter expert teacher’s employment in the school district or regional educational attendance area.

A person employed as a subject-matter expert teacher under this section is considered a certificated employee for purposes of AS 14.25 (teachers’ retirement system). Employment as a subject-matter expert teacher under this section counts as employment for purposes of acquiring tenure under AS

14.20.150

; however, a person holding a subject-matter expert limited teacher certificate under this section is not entitled to tenure until the person receives a teacher certificate under AS

14.20.020

.

The department shall adopt regulations necessary to implement this section.

In this section, “subject-matter expert teacher” is a teacher qualified to teach under (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 69 SLA 2001; am § 11 ch 79 SLA 2004)

Sec. 14.20.025.
Limited teacher certificates.

Notwithstanding AS

14.20.020(b)

, a person may be issued a limited certificate, valid only in the area of expertise for which it is issued, to teach Alaska Native language or culture, military science, or a vocational or technical course for which the board determines by regulation that baccalaureate degree training is not sufficiently available. A limited certificate may be issued under this section only if the school board of the district or regional educational attendance area in which the person will be teaching has requested its issuance. A person who applies for a limited certificate shall demonstrate, as required by regulations adopted by the board, instructional skills and subject matter expertise sufficient to ensure the public that the person is competent as a teacher. The board may require a person issued a limited certificate to undertake academic training as may be required by the board by regulation and make satisfactory progress in the academic training.

History.

(§ 2 ch 76 SLA 1992; am § 25 ch 83 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For certification of professional teachers, see 4 AAC 12.

Sec. 14.20.027.
Reporting of and access to social security numbers.

Notwithstanding AS

14.20.010

—

14.20.040

, the department may not issue a teacher certificate under AS

14.20.020

or a limited teacher certificate under AS

14.20.025

unless the applicant has supplied the department with the applicant’s social security number. Upon request, the department shall provide the social security number to the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

, or the child support enforcement agency of another state, for child support purposes authorized under law.

History.

(§ 14 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency created in AS

25.27.010

” was changed to “child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

” in this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Sec. 14.20.030.
Causes for revocation and suspension.

The commissioner or the Professional Teaching Practices Commission may revoke or suspend a certificate only for the following reasons:

incompetency, which is defined as the inability or the unintentional or intentional failure to perform the teacher’s customary teaching duties in a satisfactory manner;

immorality, which is defined as the commission of an act which, under the laws of the state, constitutes a crime involving moral turpitude;

substantial noncompliance with the school laws of the state or the regulations of the department; or

upon a determination by the Professional Teaching Practices Commission that there has been a violation of ethical or professional standards or contractual obligations.

The commissioner or the Professional Teaching Practices Commission shall revoke for life the certificate of a person who has been convicted of a crime, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit a crime, involving a minor under AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.460

or a law or ordinance in another jurisdiction with elements similar to an offense described in this subsection.

The commissioner or the Professional Teaching Practices Commission shall request the chief administrative law judge (AS

44.64.020

), to appoint an administrative law judge employed by the office of administrative hearings to preside at a hearing conducted under this section. AS

44.64.060

and

44.64.070

do not apply to the hearing.

History.

(§ 11 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 9 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 103 SLA 1976; am § 8 ch 151 SLA 1990; am § 18 ch 81 SLA 1998; am § 30 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, in (b) of this section, “AS

11.41.434

—

11.41.440

” was substituted for “AS

11.41.434

— 11.41.442” in two places to correct a manifest error in § 8, ch. 151, SLA 1990.

Administrative Code. —

For certification of professional teachers, see 4 AAC 12.

For professional standards, see 20 AAC 10, art. 1.

For complaints and investigations, see 20 AAC 10, art. 3.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 10, ch. 151, SLA 1990 provides that subsection (b) does not apply when the crime occurred before September 19, 1990.

Sec. 14.20.035.
Evaluation of training and experience.

In evaluating an applicant for a position in a district or regional educational attendance area, a district or regional educational attendance area shall give preference to those applicants who demonstrate training or experience that establishes that the applicant is likely to be sensitive to the traditions and culture of the cultural backgrounds represented in the student population.

History.

(§ 2 ch 105 SLA 1992)

Sec. 14.20.040.
Applicability of the Administrative Procedure Act.

AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) applies to all proceedings under AS

14.20.030

, and revocations and suspensions are final and reviewable in accordance with AS

44.62.560

—

44.62.570

.

History.

(§ 12 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 9 SLA 1975)

Sec. 14.20.090.
Revocation of certificates. [Repealed, § 59 ch 98 SLA 1966.]